Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-1608
Uniform energy efficiency standards; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that consumers have an expectation that newly built houses or buildings they buy meet uniform energy efficiency standards. Therefor, the Legislature finds that there is a need to adopt the 2018 International Energy Conservation Code, published by the International Code Council, in order (1) to ensure that a minimum energy efficiency standard is maintained throughout the state, (2) to harmonize and clarify energy building code statutory references, (3) to ensure compliance with the federal Energy Policy Act of 1992, (4) to increase energy savings for all Nebraska consumers, especially low-income Nebraskans, (5) to reduce the cost of state programs that provide assistance to low-income Nebraskans, (6) to reduce the amount of money expended to import energy, (7) to reduce the growth of energy consumption, (8) to lessen the need for new power plants, and (9) to provide training for local code officials and residential and commercial builders who implement the 2018 International Energy Conservation Code.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 32;

Laws 2004, LB 888, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB329, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB405, § 6.